North Dakota, session 69, HB1100.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. EXEMPTION - DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION - GRANTS FOR
FREE MEALS - QUALIFIED DELINQUENT MEAL DEBT - LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT
REPORT. The sum of $6,000,000 from the general fund appropriated to the department of
public instruction for grants for free meals in section 17 of chapter 173 of the 2023 Session
Laws is not subject to section 54-44.1-11 and any unspent funds may be continued into the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The superintendent of public
instruction shall use the funding continued into the 2025-27 biennium to provide grants to
reimburse school districts for qualified delinquent meal debt. For purposes of this section,
"qualified delinquent meal debt" is defined as meal debt incurred between July 1, 2023, and
June 30, 2025. Grant funds must be provided to each school district based on the district's
prorated share of total statewide qualified delinquent meal debt as of June 30, 2025, not to
exceed the school district's actual amount of delinquent meal debt as of June 30, 2025. The
superintendent of public instruction shall report to legislative management regarding the funding
continued, total delinquent meal debt by school district, and qualified delinquent meal debt grant
funding provided to each school district.
Page No. 1 25.0574.02000